Wisconsin, session 2025, AB401.
do enact as follows:AB401,13Section 1. 943.01 (2) (e) of the statutes is amended to read:AB401,2,24943.01 (2) (e) The property damaged is on state-owned publicly owned land or 5is maintained by the state or any county or municipality and either is listed on the 1registry under sub. (5) or is a structure, plaque, statue, painting, or other 2monument of commemorative or historical significance.AB401,23Section 2. 943.017 (2) (e) of the statutes is amended to read:AB401,2,74943.017 (2) (e) The property affected is on state-owned publicly owned land or 5is maintained by the state or any county or municipality and either is listed on the 6registry under s. 943.01 or is a structure, plaque, statue, painting, or other 7monument of commemorative or historical significance.AB401,2,88